Indiana, session 2026, HB1027.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-14-13-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 193, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. Subject to section 7.1 of this
chapter, the bureau may disclose certain personal information that is
not highly restricted personal information if the person requesting the
information provides proof of identity and represents that the use of the
personal information will be strictly limited to at least one (1) of the
following:
(1) For use by a government agency, including a court or law
enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or a person
acting on behalf of a government agency in carrying out its
functions.
(2) For use in connection with matters concerning:
(A) motor vehicle or driver safety and theft;
(B) motor vehicle emissions;
(C) motor vehicle product alterations, recalls, or advisories;
(D) performance monitoring of motor vehicles, motor vehicle
2026 IN 1027—LS 6193/DI 119


parts, and dealers;
(E) motor vehicle market research activities, including survey
research;
(F) the removal of nonowner records from the original owner
records of motor vehicle manufacturers; and
(G) motor fuel theft under IC 24-4.6-5.
(3) For use in the normal course of business by a business or its
agents, employees, or contractors, but only:
(A) to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted
by an individual to the business or its agents, employees, or
contractors; and
(B) if information submitted to a business is not correct or is
no longer correct, to obtain the correct information only for
purposes of preventing fraud by pursuing legal remedies
against, or recovering on a debt or security interest against, the
individual.
(4) For use in connection with a civil, a criminal, an
administrative, or an arbitration proceeding in a court or
government agency or before a self-regulatory body, including the
service of process, investigation in anticipation of litigation, and
the execution or enforcement of judgments and orders, or under
an order of a court.
(5) For use in research activities, and for use in producing
statistical reports, as long as the personal information is not
published, redisclosed, or used to contact the individuals who are
the subject of the personal information.
(6) For use by an insurer, an insurance support organization, or a
self-insured entity, or the agents, employees, or contractors of an
insurer, an insurance support organization, or a self-insured entity
in connection with claims investigation activities, anti-fraud
activities, rating, or underwriting.
(7) For use in providing notice to the owners of towed or
impounded vehicles.
(8) For use by a licensed private investigative agency or licensed
security service for a purpose allowed under this section.
(9) For use by an employer or its agent or insurer to obtain or
verify information relating to a holder of a commercial driver's
license that is required under the Commercial Motor Vehicle
Safety Act of 1986 (49 U.S.C. 31131 et seq.).
(10) For use in connection with the operation of private toll
transportation facilities.
(11) For any use in response to requests for individual motor
2026 IN 1027—LS 6193/DI 119


vehicle records when the bureau has obtained the written consent
of the person to whom the personal information pertains.
(12) For bulk distribution for surveys, marketing, or solicitations
when the bureau has obtained the written consent of the person to
whom the personal information pertains.
(13) For use by any person, when the person demonstrates, in a
form and manner prescribed by the bureau, that written consent
has been obtained from the individual who is the subject of the
information.
(14) For any other use specifically authorized by law that is
related to the operation of a motor vehicle or public safety.
However, this section does not affect the use of anatomical gift
information on a person's driver's license or identification document
issued by the bureau, nor does this section affect the administration of
anatomical gift initiatives in Indiana.
SECTION 2. IC 9-14-13-7.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7.1. (a) The bureau may not sell the personal
information of an individual who:
(1) is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) is sixty-five (65) years of age or older; or
(3) opts out of the sale of the individual's personal
information.
(b) The bureau shall provide an:
(1) easily understandable; and
(2) easily accessible;
means by which an individual may opt out of the sale of the
individual's personal information for purposes of subsection (a).
SECTION 3. IC 9-14-13-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 193, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) An authorized recipient of
personal information under section 7 of this chapter may not sell,
resell, disclose, or redisclose personal information described in
section 7.1(a) of this chapter.
(a) (b) Except as provided in subsection (a), an authorized
recipient of personal information, except a recipient under section
7(11) or 7(12) of this chapter, may resell or redisclose the information
for any use allowed under section 7 of this chapter, except for a use
under section 7(11) or 7(12) of this chapter.
(b) (c) Except as provided in subsection (a), an authorized
recipient of a record under section 7(11) of this chapter may resell or
redisclose personal information for any purpose.
2026 IN 1027—LS 6193/DI 119


(c) (d) Except as provided in subsection (a), an authorized
recipient of personal information under IC 9-14-12-8 and section 7(12)
of this chapter may resell or redisclose the personal information for use
only in accordance with section 7(12) of this chapter.
(d) (e) Except for a recipient under section 7(11) of this chapter, a
recipient who resells or rediscloses personal information is required to
maintain and make available for inspection to the bureau, upon request,
for at least five (5) years, records concerning:
(1) each person that receives the information; and
(2) the permitted use for which the information was obtained.
SECTION 4. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) As used in this
SECTION, "bureau" refers to the bureau of motor vehicles
created by IC 9-14-7-1.
(b) Upon approval by the governor, the state board of finance
may transfer money among funds or otherwise transfer, assign, or
reassign one (1) or more appropriations or parts of appropriations
to the bureau for the purpose of offsetting a shortfall in funding for
the bureau that occurs in a state fiscal year beginning before July
1, 2028, as a result of the enactment of IC 9-14-13-7.1, as added by
this act.
(c) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
2026 IN 1027—LS 6193/DI 119